Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,267
Food establishment, food processing plant, or salvage operation; construction, conversion, or remodeling; plans and specifications; requirements.

Prior to construction of, conversion to, or remodeling of a food establishment, food processing plant, or salvage operation, properly prepared plans and specifications for such construction, conversion, or remodeling shall be submitted to the regulatory authority for review and approval. The plans and specifications shall indicate the proposed layout, arrangement, mechanical plans, construction materials of work areas, type and model of proposed fixed equipment and facilities, and description of the type of food to be served or sold. The regulatory authority shall treat such plans and specifications as confidential or trade secret information and shall approve the plans and specifications if they meet the requirements of the Nebraska Pure Food Act. No food establishment, food processing plant, or salvage operation shall be constructed, converted, or remodeled except in accordance with plans and specifications approved by the regulatory authority. This section does not apply to food establishments which are temporary food establishments.

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 36;

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 21;

Laws 2004, LB 1045, § 4.